Tennessee, session 114, HB0838.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 71, Chapter 5, is amended by adding
the following as a new part:
71-5-2701. Part definitions.
As used in this part:
(1) "Eligible household" means a household in which:
(A) At least three (3) members of the same family reside and for
which a federal income tax return is filed in which at least one (1) member
of the family is listed as a dependent;
(B) Each member of the household is a resident of this state; and
(C) The adjusted gross income attributable to the household does
not exceed thirty thousand dollars ($30,000), not including a
supplemental income grant received pursuant to this section; and
(2) "Family member" means a spouse, child, grandchild, parent,
grandparent, sibling, niece, or nephew, whether by marriage, blood, or adoption.
71-5-2702. Pilot program for annual supplemental income grants – Amount of
grants – Forms and rules – Supplemental income grant fund – Termination.
(a) The department of human services shall develop and implement a five-year
pilot program in which eligible households are awarded an annual supplemental income
grant beginning in 2026.
HB0838
001015
- 1 -

(b) The department of human services shall distribute supplemental income
grants in the amount of five thousand dollars ($5,000) per year, which may be paid as a
monthly or quarterly installment or in a lump sum, to each eligible household that
submits a completed application and any supporting documents required by the
department. An eligible household must reapply to receive a grant in a subsequent year.
(c) The department shall promulgate forms and rules necessary to effectuate
this part. Rules must be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative
Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, and the department shall make forms
available on the department's website.
(d) The supplemental income grant pilot program established pursuant to this
section is funded through the supplemental income grant fund established as a separate
account in the general fund. Subject to the availability of revenue at the end of each
fiscal year, the commissioner of finance and administration shall carry forward any
amounts remaining in the fund. Moneys in the fund must be invested by the state
treasurer pursuant to title 9, chapter 4, part 6, for the sole benefit of the fund. It is the
legislative intent that the supplemental income grant fund established pursuant to this
subsection (d) be funded from the following sources:
(1) From gifts or donations made by individuals or entities who pay the
excise tax pursuant to the Excise Tax Law of 1999, compiled in title 67, chapter
4, part 20, or the franchise tax pursuant to the Franchise Tax Law of 1999,
compiled in title 67, chapter 4, part 21;
(2) From federal grants or funds that may be used for such purposes;
and
(3) From the reserve for revenue fluctuations, established in § 9-4-211.
- 2 - 001015

(e) The pilot program terminates December 31, 2030, and any unallocated
moneys remaining in the supplemental income grant fund must be deposited in the
reserve for revenue fluctuations.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 9-4-211, is amended by adding the
following as a new subsection:
(e) Notwithstanding this section, amounts in the revenue fluctuation reserve
must be made available to fund supplemental income grants in accordance with § 71-5-
2702.
SECTION 3. The headings in this act are for reference purposes only and do not
constitute a part of the law enacted by this act. However, the code commission is requested to
include the headings in any compilation or publication containing this act.
SECTION 4. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 3 - 001015